Utah statutes.
64-13-31.   Emergencies.
In the case of riots, disturbances, or other emergencies at correctional
facilities, the Department of Corrections has authority to direct the
resolution of the emergencies.  The department may request and coordinate the
assistance of other state and local agencies in responding to the emergencies.
